Utah statutes.
38-1-20.   When contract price not payable in cash -- Notice.
As to all liens, except that of the contractor, the whole contract price shall
be payable in money, except as herein provided, and shall not be diminished by
any prior or subsequent indebtedness, offset or counterclaim in favor of the
owner and against the contractor, except when the owner has contracted to pay
otherwise than in cash, in which case the owner shall post in a conspicuous
place on the premises a statement of the terms and conditions of the contract
before materials are furnished or labor is performed, which notice must be
kept posted, and when so posted shall give notice to all parties interested of
the terms and conditions of the contract. Any person willfully tearing down or
defacing such notice is guilty of a misdemeanor.
